Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Chapter 10 Sunset Law [Repealed]

§§ 28-10-101 through 28-10-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 58, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1979, ch. 31, § 1, comprised the Sunset Law. For the provisions of these sections as last amended, see the 1987 cumulative supplement.

These sections were also purportedly amended by Laws 1988, ch. 69, § 1. These amendments were not set out due to the repeal of these sections by Laws 1988, ch. 58, § 2.